Utah statutes.
78B-19-109.   Disclosure of information.

Except as provided by law other than this chapter, during the collaborative law process, on the request of another party, a party shall make timely, full, candid, and informal disclosure of information related to the collaborative matter without formal discovery.  A party also shall update promptly previously disclosed information that has materially changed.  Parties may define the scope of disclosure during the collaborative law process.



Enacted by Chapter 382, 2010 General Session

